Maine, session 132, LD1646.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17-A MRSA §1111-B, first ¶, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 724, §1, is
amended to read:
When a medical professional or law enforcement officer has been dispatched to the a
location of a medical emergency in response to a call for assistance for a suspected drug-
related overdose or a call for assistance for a person exhibiting symptoms of a drug-related
overdose, the following provisions apply to any protected person at the location when the
medical professional or the law enforcement officer arrives. The immunity provisions of
subsections 2 and 3 apply for the duration of the response to the medical emergency and
end when the medical professional or law enforcement officer leaves the location of the
medical emergency.
Sec. 2. 17-A MRSA §1111-B, sub-§1, ¶D is enacted to read:
D. "Symptom of a drug-related overdose" means any physical, cognitive or behavioral
condition that may reasonably indicate that a person is experiencing a potentially life-
threatening reaction to drug use. This includes, but is not limited to, altered mental
status, such as confusion, disorientation, unresponsiveness, agitation or paranoia;
impaired or irregular breathing, such as shallow, slow, erratic or absent respiration;
abnormal skin appearance, such as discoloration in skin tone, excessive sweating or
clamminess; changes in consciousness, such as unconsciousness, difficulty staying
awake or sudden collapse; involuntary bodily functions, such as vomiting, seizures,
incontinence or loss of motor control; abnormal vocalizations or respiratory sounds,
such as choking, gurgling, gasping or loud snoring and any other symptom that could
reasonably be associated with drug ingestion, use or exposure.
Sec. 3. 17-A MRSA §1111-B, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 724, §1, is
amended to read:
2. Immunity from arrest or prosecution. Except with regard to an excluded crime,
a protected person is immune from arrest or prosecution for a violation of law if:
A. The grounds for the arrest or prosecution are obtained as a result of a medical
professional's or law enforcement officer's responding to a request for medical
assistance; or
B. The identity of the protected person is learned or the protected person is identified
as a person subject to arrest or prosecution as a result of a medical professional's or law
enforcement officer's responding to a request for medical assistance.
Sec. 4. 17-A MRSA §1111-B, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 724, §1, is
amended to read:
3. Immunity from revocation or termination proceedings. Except when the charge
or conviction is for an excluded crime, a protected person is immune from revocation
proceedings with regard to conditions of release as described in Title 15, chapter 105‑A,
subchapter 5; probation as described in chapter 67, subchapter 1; administrative release as
described in chapter 67, subchapter 2; or supervised community confinement as described
in Title 34‑A, section 3036‑A and is immune from termination proceedings for deferred
disposition violations as described in chapter 67, subchapter 4 or termination from
community confinement monitoring as described in Title 30‑A, section 1659‑A, if:
Page 1 - 132LR2430(01)

A. The grounds for the revocation or termination proceeding against the protected
person are obtained as a result of a medical professional's or law enforcement officer's
responding to a request for medical assistance; or
B. The identity of the protected person is learned or the protected person is identified
as a person subject to a revocation or termination proceeding as a result of a medical
professional's or law enforcement officer's responding to a request for medical
assistance.